North Carolina statutes. Chapter 131D. Inspection and Licensing of Facilities.
Article 2. Local Confinement Facilities.

§ 131D-11.
Inspection.

The Department of Health and Human Services shall, as authorized by G.S. 153-51, inspect regularly all local confinement facilities as defined by G.S. 153-50(4) to determine compliance with the minimum standards for local confinement facilities adopted by the Social Services Commission.

History.

1868-9, c. 170, s. 5; Code, s. 2335; Rev., s. 3917; 1917, c. 170, s. 1; C.S., s. 5008; 1957, c. 86; 1961, c. 186; 1969, c. 546, s. 1; 1973, c. 476, s. 138; 1981, c. 275, s. 2; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a).

Cross References.

As to detention of juveniles in holdover facilities inspected pursuant to this Part and

G.S. 153A-222

where no juvenile detention home is available, see now

G.S. 7B-505

and 7B-1905.

§ 131D-12.
Approval of new facilities.

The Department of Health and Human Services shall, as authorized by G.S. 153-51, approve the plans for the construction or major modification of any local confinement facility.

History.

1868-9, c. 170, s. 5; Code, s. 2335; Rev., s. 3917; 1917, c. 170, s. 1; C.S., s. 5008; 1957, c. 86; 1961, c. 186; 1969, c. 546, s. 1; 1973, c. 476, s. 138; 1981, c. 275, s. 2; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a).

§ 131D-13.
Failure to provide information.

If the board of commissioners of any county, the chief of police of any municipality, or any officer or employee of any local confinement facility shall fail or refuse to furnish to the Department of Health and Human Services any information about any local confinement facility which is required by law to be furnished, or shall fail to allow the inspection of any such facility, such board or individual shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

1869-70, c. 154, s. 3; Code, s. 2341; 1891, c. 491, s. 2; Rev., s. 3566; C.S., s. 5013; 1957, c. 100, s. 1; 1969, c. 546, s. 1; 1973, c. 476, s. 138; 1981, c. 275, s. 2; 1993, c. 539, s. 956; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a).

§§ 131D-14 through 131D-18.

Reserved for future codification purposes.